Illinois, session 104th, SB1531.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Disposable Food Service Container Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act, unless the context 7requires otherwise:8    "Disposable food service container" means service ware 9designed for one-time use. "Disposable food service container" 10includes, but is not limited to, service ware for take-out 11foods, bakery products, and leftovers from partially consumed 12meals. "Disposable food service container" does not include 13polystyrene foam coolers, ice chests that are used for the 14processing or shipping of seafood, egg cartons, or service 15ware that is used to contain, transport, or otherwise package 16raw, uncooked, or butchered meat, poultry, fish, or seafood.17    "Person" means any individual, partnership, 18co-partnership, firm, company, limited liability company, 19corporation, association, joint stock company, trust, estate, 20political subdivision, state agency, or any other legal 21entity, or their legal representative, agent, or assigns.22    "Polystyrene foam" means blown polystyrene and expanded or 23extruded foams using a styrene monomer.  SB1531 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10048 BDA 20119 b1    "Service ware" means a container, bowl, plate, tray, 2carton, cup, lid, or other item designed to contain, 3transport, serve, or aid in the consumption of food or 4beverages. 5    Section 10. Disposable food service containers composed of 6polystyrene foam prohibited. 7    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a person may not 8sell or distribute in this State a disposable food service 9container that is composed in whole or in part of polystyrene 10foam beginning January 1, 2030.11    (b) The prohibition in subsection (a) does not apply to 12any activity authorized under an ordinance or resolution 13adopted by a home rule municipality or home rule county on or 14before January 1, 2024 or with respect to sales made to a unit 15of local government for use by the unit of local government for 16its internal operations.17    (c) The prohibition in subsection (a) does not prohibit 18manufacturing of disposable food service containers that are 19composed in whole or in part of polystyrene foam for 20distribution or sale outside the State. 21    Section 15. Penalties and enforcement.22    (a) A person who violates any provision of this Act shall 23be provided with a written warning with a notice of violation; 24a civil penalty of up to $500 for a second offense; and a civil   SB1531 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10048 BDA 20119 b1penalty of up to $1,000 for any subsequent offense within a 212-month period.3    (b) Any violation of this Act may be enforced by the 4Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the county in 5which the violation occurs. The penalties provided for in 6subsection (a) may be recovered in a civil action brought in 7the name of the people of the State of Illinois by the State's 8Attorney of the county in which the violation occurred or by 9the Attorney General. Any penalties collected under this 10Section in an action in which the Attorney General has 11prevailed shall be deposited into the Environmental Protection 12Trust Fund, to be used in accordance with the provisions of the 13Environmental Protection Trust Fund Act. The Attorney General 14or the State's Attorney of a county in which a violation occurs 15may institute a civil action for an injunction, prohibitory or 16mandatory, to restrain violations of this Act or to require 17such actions as may be necessary to address violations of this 18Act.19    (c) The penalties and injunctions provided in this Act are 20in addition to any penalties, injunctions, or other relief 21provided under any other law. Nothing in this Act bars a cause 22of action by the State for any other penalty, injunction, or 23other relief provided by any other law.24    (d) A home rule unit may not regulate the sale and 25distribution of disposable food service containers composed in 26whole or in part of polystyrene foam in a manner that is   SB1531 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10048 BDA 20119 b1inconsistent with the regulation by the State of the sale and 2distribution of disposable food service containers composed in 3whole or in part of polystyrene foam under this Act. This 4Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 5Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 6exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 7by the State. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.